Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-810.01
State or political subdivision; exempt from contract with labor organization.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State of Nebraska and any political or governmental subdivision thereof cannot be compelled to enter into any contract or agreement, written or otherwise, with any labor organization concerning grievances, labor disputes, rates of pay, hours of employment or conditions of work.

Laws 1967, c. 304, § 2, p. 827.

A contract continuation clause is not a contract for a future contract year in violation of this section. Central City Ed. Assn. v. Merrick Cty. Sch. Dist., 280 Neb. 27, 783 N.W.2d 600 (2010).

If a school district refuses to recognize a teachers organization it cannot be compelled to do so, and the problems are then for solution by the Court of Industrial Relations. Sidney Education Assn. v. School Dist. of Sidney, 189 Neb. 540, 203 N.W.2d 762 (1973).

While Court of Industrial Relations may not order a school district to enter into a contract, it has the power to settle a dispute. School Dist. of Seward Education Assn. v. School Dist. of Seward, 188 Neb. 772, 199 N.W.2d 752 (1972).